Maryland, session 2025, HB0047.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
11–211.
(c) The sales and use tax does not apply to a sale of:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0047*

HOUSE BILL 47
(1) [baby oil or baby powder;
(2)] diapers;
[(3)] (2) diaper rash cream;
[(4) baby wipes;
(5)] (3) toothbrushes, toothpaste, tooth powders, mouthwash, dental
floss, or other similar oral hygiene products; or
[(6)] (4) sanitary pads, tampons, menstrual sponges, menstrual cups, or
other similar feminine hygiene products.
11–244.
The sales and use tax does not apply to a sale of:
(1) BABY FOOD OR BABY FORMULA;
(2) BABY OIL OR BABY POWDER;
(3) BABY WIPES;
(4) A POTTY CHAIR DESIGNED FOR USE BY CHILDREN;
(5) an infant car seat;
(6) A HIGH CHAIR OR BOOSTER SEAT;
(7) A CRIB OR BASSINET;
(8) A STROLLER;
(9) AN ITEM OF INFANT CLOTHING, A SWADDLE, A BIB, OR AN INFANT
BLANKET; OR
(10) A BABY MONITOR.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.